Utah statutes.
53A-3-427.   Honorary high school diploma for certain veterans.

(1)  A board of education of a school district may award an honorary high school diploma to a veteran, if the veteran:

(a)  left high school before graduating in order to serve in the armed forces of the United States;

(b)  served in the armed forces of the United States during the period of World War II, the Korean War, or the Vietnam War;

(c) (i)  was honorably discharged; or

(ii)  was released from active duty because of a service-related disability; and

(d) (i)  resides within the school district; or

(ii)  resided within the school district at the time of leaving high school to serve in the armed forces of the United States.

(2)  To receive an honorary high school diploma, a veteran or immediate family member or guardian of a veteran shall submit to a local school board:

(a)  a request for an honorary high school diploma; and

(b)  information required by the local school board to verify the veteran's eligibility for an honorary high school diploma under Subsection (1).

(3)  At the request of a veteran, a veteran's immediate family member or guardian, or a local school board, the Department of Veterans' Affairs shall certify whether the veteran meets the requirements of Subsections (1)(b) and (c).



Enacted by Chapter 312, 2008 General Session

